Illinois, session 104th, HB2276.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Arbitration Act is amended by 5changing Section 22 as follows: 6    (710 ILCS 5/22)  (from Ch. 10, par. 122)7    Sec. 22. Short title. This Act shall be known and and may 8be cited as the "Uniform Arbitration Act".9(Source: Laws 1961, p. 3844.)